Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-4638
Voter approval; effect.

If the election at which the question is submitted is a special election and sixty percent of the votes cast upon such proposition are in favor, or if the election at which the question is submitted is a general election and a majority of the votes cast upon such proposition are in favor, then the officer possessing the power and duty to ascertain and declare the result of the election shall certify the result immediately to the governing body of the city. The governing body of the city may then proceed to tender the amount of the value and award made by the court of condemnation, district court, or the Supreme Court to the utility owning the gas system and shall have the right and power to take immediate possession of the gas system upon the tender.

Laws 2002, LB 384, § 15.